Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 3 Contracts of County Commissioners with County

45-10-60.
Requirements for sales of real property by county commissioner to county.

Notwithstanding any other provision of general or local law, a county commissioner or member of a board of county commissioners may sell real property to the county if all of the following conditions are met:

The real property which is the subject of the sale is adjacent to a landfill owned and operated by the county;

The real property which is the subject of the sale is to be used by the county in connection with the operation of the landfill;

The sale price of the real property does not exceed the lowest of three appraisals of the fair market value of the property made by three appraisers appointed by the probate judge of the county; and

Disclosure of the sale is made as required by Code Section 16-10-6.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 619, § 1.